Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-1006
Change to rates or charges; notice.

A private water company which proposes to change any of its rates or charges shall provide sixty days' notice to its customers and the commission of the proposed rates or charges.

Laws 1994, LB 1002, § 6.